Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB573.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 511.1 of the act of April 6, 1951 (P.L.69, No.20), known as The Landlord and Tenant Act of 1951, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 511.1. Escrow Funds Limited.--* * *(d.1) A lease or rental agreement may not contain a provision which characterizes a security deposit, including a deposit or fee for a pet, as nonrefundable.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314151617